Massachusetts, session 194th, H1653.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 1 of Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definitions:
"Political matters" means matters relating to elections for political office, political
parties, proposals to change legislation, proposals to change regulation and the decision to join or
support any political party or political, civic, community, fraternal or labor organization; and
"Religious matters" means matters relating to religious affiliation and practice and the
decision to join or support any religious organization or association.
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 20F. Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, any employer,
including the state and any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, who subjects or
threatens to subject any employee to discipline or discharge on account of (1) the exercise by
of 3

such employee of rights guaranteed by the first amendment to the United States Constitution,
provided such activity does not substantially or materially interfere with the employee's bona
fide job performance or the working relationship between the employee and the employer, or (2)
such employee's refusal to (a) attend an employer-sponsored meeting with the employer or its
agent, representative or designee, the primary purpose of which is to communicate the
employer's opinion concerning religious or political matters, or (b) listen to speech or view
communications, including electronic communications, the primary purpose of which is to
communicate the employer's opinion concerning religious or political matters, shall be liable to
such employee for damages caused by such discipline or discharge, including punitive damages,
and for reasonable attorney's fees as part of the costs of any such action for damages, and the full
amount of gross loss of wages or compensation, with costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as
may be allowed by the court.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit: (1) An employer or its agent, representative or
designee from communicating to its employees any information that the employer is required by
law to communicate, but only to the extent of such legal requirement; (2) an employer or its
agent, representative or designee from communicating to its employees any information that is
necessary for such employees to perform their job duties; (3) an institution of higher education,
or any agent, representative or designee of such institution, from meeting with or participating in
any communications with its employees that are part of coursework, any symposia or an
academic program at such institution; (4) casual conversations between employees or between an
employee and an agent, representative or designee of an employer, provided participation in such
conversations is not required; or (5) a requirement limited to the employer's managerial and
supervisory employees.
of 3

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a religious corporation, entity,
association, educational institution or society that is exempt from the requirements of Title VII of
the Civil Rights Act of 1964 pursuant to 42 USC 2000e-1(a) or is exempt from sections 4a-60a,
46a- 81a and 46a-81o pursuant to section 46a-81p, with respect to speech on religious matters to
employees who perform work connected with the activities undertaken by such religious
corporation, entity, association, educational institution or society.
of 3